Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-841
Legal description of unit; requirements.

A description of a unit which sets forth the name of the condominium, the recording data for the declaration, the county in which the condominium is located, and the identifying number of the unit, is a sufficient legal description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit which were created by the declaration or bylaws.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 17.